Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2423
Projects other than power projects; certificate of incorporation; issuance; Secretary of State; duties.

The Secretary of State shall examine the certificate and, if he or she finds that the name proposed for the agency is not identical with that of any other corporation or public authority of this state, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, and that such certificate conforms to the requirements of sections 18-2419 to 18-2424, the Secretary of State shall record it and issue and record a certificate of incorporation. The certificate shall state the name of the agency, the fact and date of incorporation, and the names of the participating municipalities. Upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation, the existence of the agency as a public body corporate and politic of this state shall commence. Notice of the issuance of such certificate shall be given to all of the proposed participating municipalities by the Secretary of State. If a director of any such municipality has not signed the certificate to the Secretary of State and such municipality does not notify the Secretary of State of the appointment of a director within thirty days after receipt of notice of the issuance of a certificate of incorporation, such municipality shall be deemed to have elected not to be a participating municipality. As soon as practicable after the expiration of such thirty-day period, the Secretary of State shall issue an amended certificate of incorporation, if necessary, setting forth the names of those municipalities which have elected to become participating municipalities. The failure of any proposed municipality to become a participating municipality shall not affect the validity of the corporate existence of the agency.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 23.